Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
359G

HAWAII
HOUSING AUTHORITY--HOUSING PROJECTS

REPEALED. L 1987, c 337, §14.

Cross References

Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, see
chapter 201H.

Hawaii public housing authority, see chapter 356D.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next